Florida, session 2026, SB1142.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 17 465.0125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 18 465.0125âConsultant pharmacist license; application, 19 renewal, fees; responsibilities; rules.â 20 (1)âThe department shall issue or renew a consultant 21 pharmacist license upon receipt of an initial or renewal 22 application that conforms to the requirements for consultant 23 pharmacist initial licensure or renewal as adopted by the board 24 by rule and a fee set by the board not to exceed $250. To be 25 licensed as a consultant pharmacist, a pharmacist must complete 26 additional training as required by the board. 27 (e)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âhealth care 28 facilityâ means an ambulatory surgical center or hospital 29 licensed under chapter 395, an alcohol or chemical dependency 30 treatment center licensed under chapter 397, an inpatient 31 hospice licensed under part IV of chapter 400, a nursing home 32 licensed under part II of chapter 400, an ambulatory care center 33 as defined in s. 408.07, or a nursing home component under 34 chapter 400 within a continuing care facility licensed under 35 chapter 651, or a health care clinic licensed under part X of 36 chapter 400 which is owned by a hospital or by one or more 37 physicians that are employed by a hospital. 38 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (e) through (x) of subsection 39 (1) of section 626.8825, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 40 paragraphs (f) through (y), respectively, a new paragraph (e) is 41 added to that subsection, and paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of 42 that section is amended, to read: 43 626.8825âPharmacy benefit manager transparency and 44 accountability.â 45 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 46 (e)ââCovered prescription drugâ means any drug or biologic 47 included in a pharmacy benefit managerâs formulary which is paid 48 for as a pharmacy benefit under the plan at any of the planâs 49 network pharmacies. 50 (2)âCONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A 51 PHARMACY BENEFITS PLAN OR PROGRAM.âIn addition to any other 52 requirements in the Florida Insurance Code, all contractual 53 arrangements executed, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after 54 July 1, 2023, which are applicable to pharmacy benefits covered 55 on or after January 1, 2024, between a pharmacy benefit manager 56 and a pharmacy benefits plan or program must include, in 57 substantial form, terms that ensure compliance with all of the 58 following requirements and that, except to the extent not 59 allowed by law, shall supersede any contractual terms to the 60 contrary: 61 (e)âInclude network adequacy requirements that meet or 62 exceed Medicare Part D program standards for convenient access 63 to the network pharmacies set forth in 42 C.F.R. s. 64 423.120(a)(1) and that: 65 1.âDo not limit a network to solely include affiliated 66 pharmacies; 67 2.âRequire a pharmacy benefit manager to offer a provider 68 contract to licensed pharmacies physically located on the 69 physical site of providers that are: 70 a.âWithin the pharmacy benefits planâs or programâs 71 geographic service area and that have been specifically 72 designated as essential providers by the Agency for Health Care 73 Administration pursuant to s. 409.975(1)(a); 74 b.âDesignated as cancer centers of excellence under s. 75 381.925, regardless of the pharmacy benefits planâs or programâs 76 geographic service area; 77 c.âOrgan transplant hospitals, regardless of the pharmacy 78 benefits planâs or programâs geographic service area; 79 d.âHospitals licensed as specialty childrenâs hospitals as 80 defined in s. 395.002; or 81 e.âRegional perinatal intensive care centers as defined in 82 s. 383.16(2), regardless of the pharmacy benefits planâs or 83 programâs geographic service area. 84 85 Such provider contracts must be solely for the administration 86 and or dispensing of covered prescription drugs, including 87 biological products, which are administered through infusions, 88 intravenously injected, or inhaled during a surgical procedure 89 or are covered parenteral drugs, as part of onsite outpatient 90 care; 91 3.âDo not require a covered person to receive a 92 prescription drug by United States mail, common carrier, local 93 courier, third-party company or delivery service, or pharmacy 94 direct delivery unless the prescription drug cannot be acquired 95 at any retail pharmacy in the pharmacy benefit managerâs network 96 for the covered personâs pharmacy benefits plan or program. This 97 subparagraph does not prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager from 98 operating mail order or delivery programs on an opt-in basis at 99 the sole discretion of a covered person, provided that the 100 covered person is not penalized through the imposition of any 101 additional retail cost-sharing obligations or a lower allowed 102 quantity limit for choosing not to select the mail order or 103 delivery programs; 104 4.âFor the in-person administration of covered prescription 105 drugs, prohibit requiring a covered person to receive pharmacist 106 services from an affiliated pharmacy or an affiliated health 107 care provider; and 108 5.âProhibit offering or implementing pharmacy networks that 109 require or provide a promotional item or an incentive, defined 110 as anything other than a reduced cost-sharing amount or enhanced 111 quantity limit allowed under the benefit design for a covered 112 drug, to a covered person to use an affiliated pharmacy or an 113 affiliated health care provider for the in-person administration 114 of covered prescription drugs; or advertising, marketing, or 115 promoting an affiliated pharmacy to covered persons. Subject to 116 the foregoing, a pharmacy benefit manager may include an 117 affiliated pharmacy in communications to covered persons 118 regarding network pharmacies and prices, provided that the 119 pharmacy benefit manager includes information, such as links to 120 all nonaffiliated network pharmacies, in such communications and 121 that the information provided is accurate and of equal 122 prominence. This subparagraph may not be construed to prohibit a 123 pharmacy benefit manager from entering into an agreement with an 124 affiliated pharmacy to provide pharmacist services to covered 125 persons. 126 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.